California statutes. Insurance Code
In this chapter “casualty insurance” means all classes of insurance to which the provisions of this chapter are applicable and which are included within Sections 105, 107, 108, 110, 112, 113, 115, and, when written by insurers not admitted to transact fire or marine insurance, Sections 111, 114, 116, 118 and 120.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1949, Ch. 426.)
-------------------------------------------

1850.5.

In this chapter “wilful” or “wilfully” in relation to an act or omission which constitutes a violation of this chapter means with actual knowledge or belief that such act or omission constitutes such violation and with specific intent to commit such violation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1947, Ch. 805.)
-------------------------------------------

1851.

The provisions of this chapter shall apply to all insurance on risks or on operations in this state, except:

(a) Reinsurance, other than joint reinsurance to the extent stated in Article 5 (commencing with Section 1856).

(b) Life insurance.

(c) Insurance of vessels or craft, their cargoes, marine builders’ risks, marine protection and indemnity, or other risks commonly insured under marine, as distinguished from inland marine, insurance policies. Inland marine insurance shall be deemed to include insurance now or hereafter defined by statute, or by interpretation thereof, or if
 not so defined or interpreted, by ruling of the commissioner or as established by general custom of the business, as inland marine insurance.

(d) Title insurance.

(e) Disability insurance.

(f) Workers’ compensation insurance and insurance of any liability of employers for injuries to, or death of, employees arising out of, and in the course of, employment when this insurance is incidental to, and written in connection with, the workers’ compensation insurance issued to the same employer and covering the same employer interests.

(g) Insurance transacted by county mutual fire insurers or county mutual fire reinsurers.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 786, Sec. 38.   (AB 2303)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

1851.1.

Notwithstanding subdivision (f) of Section 1851 or any other provision of law and except as and to the extent otherwise provided in Section 1854.5 and 11753.3, any classification of risks and premium rates or system of rating for insurance covering employers against their liability for compensation or damages under the United States Longshoremen’s and Harbor Workers’ Compensation Act (33 U.S.C. 901, et seq.) shall be subject to the provisions of this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1978, Ch. 813.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Making and Use of Rates [1853.5. - 1853.9.]

1853.5.

With respect to any matters pertaining to the making of rates or rating systems, the preparation or making of insurance policy or bond forms, underwriting rules, surveys, inspections and investigations, the furnishing of loss or expense statistics or other information and data, or carrying on of research, two or more admitted insurers having a common ownership or operating in this State under common management or control, are hereby authorized to act in concert between or among themselves the same as if they constituted a single insurer, and to the extent that such matters relate to co-surety bonds, two or more admitted insurers executing such bonds are hereby authorized to act in concert between or among themselves the same as if they constituted a single insurer.

(History: Added by Stats. 1947, Ch. 805.)
-------------------------------------------

1853.8.

Agreements may be made among admitted insurers with respect to the equitable apportionment among them of casualty insurance which may be afforded applicants who are in good faith entitled to but who are unable to procure such insurance through ordinary methods, and with respect to the use of reasonable rate modifications for such insurance, such agreements to be subject to the approval of the commissioner.

All such agreements shall be submitted in writing to the commissioner for his consideration and approval, together with such information as he may reasonably require. The commissioner shall approve only such agreements as are found by him to contemplate (a) the use of rates which meet the standards prescribed by this chapter and (b) activities and practices that are not unfair, unreasonable or otherwise inconsistent with the provisions of this chapter.

At any time after such agreements are in effect the commissioner may review the practices and activities of the adherents to such agreements and if after a hearing upon not less than 10 days notice to such adherents he finds that any such practice or activity is unfair or unreasonable, or is otherwise inconsistent with the provisions of this chapter, he may issue a written order to the parties to any such agreement specifying in what respects such act or practice is unfair or unreasonable or otherwise inconsistent with the provisions of this chapter and requiring the discontinuance of such activity or practice. For good cause, and after hearing upon not less than 10 days notice to the adherents thereto, the commissioner may revoke approval of any such agreement.

(History: Added by Stats. 1947, Ch. 805.)
-------------------------------------------

1853.9.

Upon compliance with the provisions of this chapter applicable thereto any rating organization, advisory organization, and any group, association or other organization of admitted insurers which engages in joint underwriting or joint reinsurance through such organization or by standing agreement among the members thereof, may conduct operations in this State. As respects insurance risks or operations in this State, no insurer shall be a member or subscriber of any such organization, group or association that has not complied with the provisions of this chapter applicable to it.

(History: Added by Stats. 1947, Ch. 805.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2.5. Making and Use of Rates—Insurance of Properties Being Purchased From Department of Veterans Affairs [1853.95. - 1853.97.]

1853.95.

Admitted insurers are hereby expressly authorized to enter into agreements with the Department of Veterans Affairs with respect to the furnishing of insurance covering property being purchased from such department pursuant to Chapter 3, Division 4 of the Military and Veterans Code or the Veterans’ Farm and Home Purchase Act of 1943, at special rates and forms for such insurance as are determined by the Director of Veterans Affairs to be reasonable.

(History: Added by Stats. 1950, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 19.)
-------------------------------------------

1853.96.

The use of such rates and forms by insurers pursuant to such agreements is hereby expressly permitted, and the provisions of Section 1852 are not applicable thereto.

(History: Added by Stats. 1950, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 19.)
-------------------------------------------

1853.97.

Automobile liability insurance and automobile physical damage insurance may, at the option of the insurer, be considered a single line for rate filing purposes.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1113, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Advisory Organizations [1855. - 1855.5.]

1855.

No advisory organization shall conduct its operations in this State unless and until it has filed with the commissioner (a) a copy of its constitution, articles of incorporation, agreement or association, and of its by-laws, or rules and regulations governing its activities, all duly certified by the custodian of the originals thereof, (b) a list of its members and subscribers, and (c) the name and address of a resident of this State upon whom notices or orders of the commissioner or process may be served.

Every such advisory organization shall notify the commissioner promptly of every change in its constitution, its articles of incorporation, agreement or association, and of its by-laws, rules and regulations governing the conduct of its business; its list of members and subscribers; and the name and address of the resident of this State designated by it upon whom notices or orders of the commissioner or process affecting such organization may be served.

No such advisory organization shall engage in any unfair or unreasonable practice with respect to such activities.

(History: Added by Stats. 1947, Ch. 805.)
-------------------------------------------

1855.1.

It is the intent of the Legislature in enacting this article to promote competition in the insurance business and provide a means whereby insurance consumers can more easily comparison shop for insurance coverage by allowing insurance advisory organizations to develop and draft for use by all insurers in California common forms, coverages, endorsements, and manuals for insurance policies and bonds.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 880, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

1855.2.

As used in this article, “advisory organization” means every group, association, or other organization of insurers, whether located within or outside of this state, that develops and prepares policy or bond forms, or manuals, for use by admitted insurers, carries on research relative to the development and preparation of policy and bond forms, and acts in an advisory, as distinguished from a ratemaking, capacity.

Every advisory organization shall, prior to operation, file with the commissioner (a) a copy or its constitution, its articles of agreement or association, or its certificate of incorporation, and its bylaws, rules, and regulations governing its activities, (b) a list of its members, and (c) the name and address of a resident of this state upon whom notices or orders of the commissioner or process issued at his or her direction may be served. Every advisory organization shall thereafter promptly notify the commissioner of every material change in the documents required to be filed with the commissioner.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 880, Sec. 5.)
-------------------------------------------

1855.3.

Two or more insurers may cooperate with and act in concert with others as members of an advisory organization with respect to any matters pertaining to the preparation or making of insurance policy or bond forms, or manuals, or carrying on of research relative to the preparation and development of policy or bond forms, or manuals.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 880, Sec. 6.)
-------------------------------------------

1855.4.

Members and subscribers of advisory organizations may use the policy or bond forms, or manuals, of advisory organizations, either consistently or intermittently, but, except for insurers having common ownership or management, shall not agree with each other or others to adhere thereto or violate the antitrust or unfair business practice laws. The fact that two or more admitted insurers are members or subscribers of an advisory organization, or the fact that they use, either consistently or intermittently, the policy or bond forms, or manuals, prepared by an advisory organization, shall not be sufficient evidence, alone or in conjunction with each other, to support a finding either that an agreement to adhere to those forms or manuals exists or that an insurer or advisory organization is violating the antitrust or unfair business practice laws. These facts may be used only for the purpose of supplementing or explaining other evidence of the existence of an agreement to adhere to those forms or manuals or the existence of the violation of the antitrust or unfair business practice laws. No act, agreement, or practice involving the activities of an advisory organization, an insurer’s participation in those activities, or the use of an advisory organization’s products or services shall be found to be unfair or unreasonable under this code because it is uncompetitive unless proven by a preponderance of the evidence that the act, agreement, or practice violates the antitrust or unfair business practice laws. Findings of this nature that are made in support of an order or regulation of the commissioner shall be determined and enforced under Article 7 (commencing with Section 1858) of this chapter. As used in this section, “antitrust laws” means Part 2 (commencing with Section 16600) of the Business and Professions Code, and “unfair business practice laws” means Part 3 (commencing with Section 17500) of the Business and Professions Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1002, Sec. 1.   Effective September 29, 1996.   [)
-------------------------------------------

1855.5.

(a) An advisory organization may prepare and distribute insurance policy or bond forms, and manuals, including policy writing rules, rating plans, classification codes and descriptions, territory codes and descriptions, prospective loss costs, and rules that include factors and relativities such as increased limits factors, classification relativities, or similar factors, if, prior to being used by insurers, they are submitted in writing to the commissioner for his or her consideration and approval, together with any information the commissioner may reasonably require. All of these documents shall be available for public inspection at the office of the commissioner. The commissioner shall approve advisory organization policy forms or bond forms, or manuals, that are not found by him or her to be unfair, unreasonable, or violate the provisions of this code, including Sections 1861.02 and 1861.05.

(b) Upon submission of any advisory organization policy forms or bond forms, or manuals, the commissioner may review them, and if after a hearing, at which representatives of consumers and other interested parties may participate, upon not less than 10 days’ notice to an advisory organization he or she finds that the contents of policy forms or bond forms, or manuals, are unfair or unreasonable, or violate the provisions of this code, he or she may issue a written order to the advisory organization specifying in what respect the contents of the policy forms, bond forms, or manuals, are unfair or unreasonable or violate the provisions of this code and disapprove the use of the forms or manuals.

(c) Notwithstanding the provisions of this section, if the commissioner fails to act within 90 days of the submission of a proposed policy or bond form, or manual by an advisory organization, the policy or bond form, or manual, shall be deemed approved.

(d) For good cause, and after a hearing, at which representatives of consumers and other interested parties may participate, upon not less than 10 days’ notice to the advisory organization, the commissioner may revoke approval of any policy form or bond form or manual only upon his or her finding grounds that would permit disapproval of the policy or bond form, or manual, if submitted for approval at the time of the revocation hearing.

(e) Nothing in this chapter shall be interpreted to allow an advisory organization to set or establish rates or to issue any manual that contains final rates for any insurance coverage, policy endorsement, or bond.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1002, Sec. 2.   Effective September 29, 1996.   [)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Joint Underwriting and Joint Reinsurance [1856. - 1856.]

1856.

Every group, association or other organization of insurers which engages in joint underwriting or joint reinsurance through such group, association or organization or by standing agreement among the members thereof shall file with the commissioner (a) a copy of its constitution, its articles of incorporation, agreement or association, and of its by-laws, rules and regulations governing its activities, all duly certified by the custodian of the originals thereof, (b) a list of its members, and (c) the name and address of a resident of this State upon whom notices or orders of the commissioner or process may be served.

Every such group, association or other organization shall notify the commissioner promptly of every change in its constitution, its articles of incorporation, agreement or association, and of its by-laws, rules and regulations governing the conduct of its business; its list of members; and the name and address of the resident of this State designated by it upon whom notices or orders of the commissioner or process affecting such group, association or organization may be served.

No such group, association or organization shall engage in any unfair or unreasonable practice with respect to such activities.

(History: Added by Stats. 1947, Ch. 805.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Records and Examinations [1857. - 1857.4.]

1857.

(a) Every insurer or advisory organization and every group, association, or other organization of insurers that engages in joint underwriting or joint reinsurance shall maintain reasonable records, of the type and kind reasonably adapted to its method of operation, of its experience or the experience of its members and of the data, statistics, or information collected or used by it in connection with the rates, rating plans, rating systems, underwriting rules, policy or bond forms, surveys, or inspections made or used by it so that those records will be available at all reasonable times to enable the commissioner to determine whether that organization, insurer, group, or association, and, in the case of an insurer, every rate, rating plan, and rating system made or used by it, complies with the provisions of this chapter applicable to it. The maintenance of those records in the office of an organization of which an insurer is a member or subscriber shall be sufficient compliance with this section for any insurer maintaining membership or subscribership in that organization, to the extent that the insurer uses the rating plans, rating systems, or underwriting rules of that organization. The records shall be maintained in an office within this state or shall be made available for examination or inspection within this state by the commissioner at any time upon reasonable notice.

(b) There are established data advisory committees to assist the commissioner in making special calls for one or more lines or types of insurance to which this chapter applies that are commercial insurance as defined in Section 675.5 and to make available the types of reasonable records that subdivision (a) requires insurers, and advisory organizations to maintain and make available. No data advisory committee shall have any authority to veto, amend, or alter any request for the reporting of records or information by the commissioner, but shall only provide advice to the commissioner relative to methods and efficiency in the collection of records and information as set forth in subdivision (c).

(c) Each data advisory committee shall review all proposed industrywide requests for records and information by the commissioner at least one time but shall not review substantially the same request made on a recurring or ad hoc basis in the future. No later than 10 business days after receipt of each proposal, the data advisory committee may advise the commissioner as to both of the following:

(1) Whether the desired records and information are already available in other forms or are being maintained by one or more insurance advisory organizations that may be able to provide the records and information to the commissioner on a more efficient and cost-effective basis.

(2) Whether the format and contents of the proposal are likely to elicit useful information and make recommendations as to changes in the format or contents of the proposal.

If the data advisory committee cannot reach unanimous agreement on its advice to the commissioner, any member may provide his or her own advice. Any written advice to the commissioner by the advisory committee and by individual members shall be submitted simultaneously.

(d) Each data advisory committee shall consist of the following members:

(1) The commissioner or his or her representative.

(2) A representative of the department’s statistical unit.

(3) No more than three representatives from advisory organizations operating under this article that maintain insurer records for the lines or types of insurance that are the subject of the call.

(4) Three representatives from various sizes of insurers chosen by the commissioner that underwrite diverse risks for the lines or types of insurance that are subject to the call.

(5) At least one but not more than two qualified consumer representatives chosen by the commissioner. As used in this section, “qualified consumer representative” means a person who has experience with the collection, use, and analysis of insurance data and who can show that he or she represents the interests of consumers as demonstrated by, but not limited to, a history of that type of representation in administrative, legislative, or judicial proceedings.

Any group, association, or insurer that represents persons described in paragraphs (1) to (5), inclusive, may submit to the commissioner the names of those persons for consideration of appointment to the advisory committee.

(e) Each data advisory committee shall meet telephonically. Members of an advisory committee shall receive no compensation.

(f) An insurer may fulfill any obligation to maintain, record, or report information under Article 6.5 (commencing with Section 1857.7) by reporting records required by subdivision (a) to an advisory organization that maintains the insurer’s records with those records of other insurers and reports the aggregate records of insurers to the department according to reasonable schedules approved by the commissioner. The aggregate reports shall be made available by the commissioner for public inspection at the department, but shall not disclose the information of an individual insured, insurer, or insurer group.

(g) Upon a request made by any person to the commissioner in conjunction with an insurer’s pending rate application, the advisory organization shall, within five business days, send to the commissioner the information in its possession regarding the individual insurer that Article 6.5 (commencing with Section 1857.7) specifically requires to be submitted with those filings. The information sent to the commissioner under this subdivision shall be available for public inspection at the department.

(h) Except as otherwise permitted or required by this section, no advisory organization shall provide an individual insurer’s information to any other insurer, person, or organization, other than rates, rating systems, and rating plans that have been filed with the commissioner and are available for public inspection at the department.

(i) The commissioner may adopt rules necessary to implement this section.

(j) Nothing in subdivisions (b) to (i), inclusive, shall be construed to affect any of the following:

(1) Any authority granted to the commissioner under this code to obtain aggregate or individual insurer data or policy records from advisory organizations or insurers.

(2) Any industrywide data reporting requirements and standards that might exist in this chapter.

(3) The right of any person under any provision of this code, including Section 1861.07, to obtain and inspect at the department the aggregate or individual records of insurers maintained by advisory organizations.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 725, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

1857.1.

The commissioner shall, at least once every five years, and may as often as may be reasonable and necessary, make or cause to be made an examination of each licensed rating organization, and he may, as often as may be reasonable and necessary, make or cause to be made an examination of any advisory organization or group, association or other organization of insurers which engages in joint underwriting or joint reinsurance.

In lieu of any such examination the commissioner may accept the report of an examination made by the insurance supervisory official of another state.

In examining any organization, group or association pursuant to this section the commissioner shall ascertain whether such organization, group or association, and, in the case of a rating organization, any rate or rating system made or used by it, complies with the requirements and standards of this chapter applicable to it.

(History: Added by Stats. 1947, Ch. 805.)
-------------------------------------------

1857.2.

The commissioner may, at any reasonable time, make or cause to be made an examination of every admitted insurer transacting any class of insurance to which the provisions of this chapter are applicable to ascertain whether such insurer and every rate and rating system used by it for every such class of insurance complies with the requirements and standards of this chapter applicable thereto. Such examination shall not be a part of a periodic general examination participated in by representatives of more than one state.

(History: Added by Stats. 1947, Ch. 805.)
-------------------------------------------

1857.3.

The officers, managers, agents and employees of any such organization, group, association or insurer may be examined at any time under oath and shall exhibit all books, records, accounts, documents or agreements governing its method of operation, together with all data, statistics and information of every kind and character collected or considered by such organization, group, association or insurer in the conduct of the operations to which such examination relates.

(History: Added by Stats. 1947, Ch. 805.)
-------------------------------------------

1857.4.

The reasonable cost of any examination authorized by this article shall be paid by the organization, group, association or insurer to be examined.

(History: Added by Stats. 1947, Ch. 805.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6.5. Recording and Reporting of Loss and Expense Experience [1857.7. - 1857.9.]

1857.7.

The application referred to in subdivision (b) of Section 1861.05 shall include, but shall not be limited to, all of the following information:

(1) Premiums written.

(2) Premiums earned.

(3) Unearned premiums.

(4) The dollar amount of claims paid.

(5) The number of outstanding claims.

(6) Net loss reserves for outstanding claims excluding claims incurred but not reported.

(7) Net loss reserves for claims incurred but not reported.

(8) Losses incurred as a percentage of premiums earned.

(9) Net investment gain or loss and other income or gain or loss allocated to products liability lines.

(10) Net income before federal and foreign income taxes.

(11) Expenses incurred including loss adjustment expense, commission and brokerage expense, other acquisition expense and general expense.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 530, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

1857.9.

(a) An insurer doing business in this state, except as provided by subdivision (f), shall report the information specified by the commissioner that is collected by a licensed advisory organization on an annual basis for each class of insurance designated in the prior calendar year by the commissioner pursuant to subdivision (b) for policies issued or issued for delivery in California. The commissioner shall waive the requirements of this subdivision for any information that has been provided to the Insurance Services Office by the insurer, if the Insurance Services Office provides the information to the commissioner on or before the date on which the insurer is required to file the statement.

(b) No later than October 1 of each year the commissioner shall designate those classes of insurance, as defined by the Insurance Services Office, that are generally unavailable or unaffordable in California, or for which there have been unusually great premium increases, or in the case of any class of liability insurance, for which reinsurance is generally unavailable or unaffordable in the state or for which there have been unusually great reinsurance premium increases. The factors the commissioner shall consider in making this determination shall include, but are not limited to, the following:

(1) Consumer complaints.

(2) Rate complaints.

(3) Surveillance by the department.

(4) Market conduct.

(c) Insurers shall not be required to report under this section information required to be reported under Sections 1857.7, 1864, 11555.2, and 12963.

(d) The department shall retain the information reported pursuant to this section for a period of no less than three years.

(e) Insurers that are members of the same insurance group may aggregate the information required by this section in a single report.

(f) The reports required by this section shall not be applicable to any insurer that has been established for less than three years or can demonstrate upon application to the commissioner that its market share is less than 1 percent of the coverage for which the commissioner seeks information. However, the commissioner may deny the exemption application if he or she reasonably determines (1) that the aggregate data, when reported, is less than 60 percent of the written premium volume for the class, or (2) that unless the insurer reported its data, the aggregate data reported would not be statistically credible or reasonably complete and informative. An insurer that has been exempted by the commissioner from reporting shall, upon request of the commissioner, report the information required by subdivision (a) to cover the three most recent calendar years, in accordance with subdivision (g). In no event shall any insurer that has reported data for a calendar year pursuant to this section be required to report that same data in a subsequent year.

(g) The reports required by this section shall be filed on a form provided by the commissioner no later than May 1 of the calendar year following the year for which the information is reported.

(h) The department shall adopt regulations implementing this section as emergency regulations in accordance with Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, except that for the purposes of Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, any regulations adopted under this section shall be deemed to be necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety, or general welfare. These regulations shall remain in effect for 180 days. The regulations may require insurers to report the information required by subdivision (d) by categories other than those used by the Insurance Services Office.

(i) The information provided pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be confidential and not revealed by the department, except that the commissioner may publish an analysis of the data in aggregate form or in a manner which does not disclose confidential information about identified insurers or insureds.

(j) An insurer may fulfill its obligation to file or submit the experience, data, statistics, or other information listed in or designated under the terms of this section by reporting its records in the manner provided by Section 1857 to a licensed advisory organization that maintains the insurer’s records and those of other insurers, makes the insurer’s records available for examination and inspection by the commissioner or reports the records of an insurer to the department upon a specific request of the commissioner, and reports the aggregate records of insurers to the department according to reasonable schedules approved by the commissioner. The reports of aggregate records shall not disclose the information of any individual insured, insurer, or insurer group.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 350, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. Hearings, Procedure and Judicial Review [1858. - 1858.7.]

1858.

(a) Any person aggrieved by any rate charged, rating plan, rating system, or underwriting rule followed or adopted by an insurer or rating organization, may file a written complaint with the commissioner requesting that the commissioner review the manner in which the rate, plan, system, or rule has been applied with respect to the insurance afforded to that person. In addition, the aggrieved person may file a written request for a public hearing before the commissioner, specifying the grounds relied upon.

(b) The commissioner shall advise the insurer or rating organization that a complaint has been filed against it and the nature of the complaint and provide the insurer or rating organization with an opportunity to respond to the complaint.

(c) If the commissioner has information concerning a similar complaint, he or she may deny the request for a public hearing until a determination is made or a public hearing is held on the similar complaint or may consolidate similar complaints for determination or public hearing. If he or she believes, after review and investigation of the facts alleged in the complaint and the facts alleged in any response to the complaint, that probable cause for the complaint does not exist or that the complaint is not made in good faith, he or she shall so advise the complainant and shall deny any request made for a public hearing. If he or she believes, after review and investigation of the facts alleged in the complaint and the facts alleged in any response to the complaint, that probable cause for the complaint does exist, that the complaint charges a violation of this chapter, and that the complainant would be aggrieved if the violation is proven, he or she shall proceed as provided in Section 1858.1 unless the complaint was accompanied by a request for public hearing, in which case he or she shall proceed as provided in Section 1858.2.

(d) Nothing in this section prohibits or limits the right of any aggrieved person, either prior to or in conjunction with the filing of a written complaint with the commissioner under this section, from requesting an insurer or rating organization to review the manner in which the rate, plan, system, or rule has been applied with respect to the insurance afforded to that person.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1289, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

1858.01.

(a) Whenever a written complaint has been filed with the commissioner, the commissioner shall review and investigate the matter complained of as provided by Section 1858 and shall make a determination whether there is probable cause to believe that a violation of this chapter has occurred. This determination shall be made within a reasonable time, but in no event more than 60 days after the complaint regarding a policy in a personal line of insurance or 90 days in the case of a policy in a class of commercial insurance is filed unless the complainant consents to a greater time or unless the complainant enters into informal conciliation of the complaint. The time and location of the conciliation shall be mutually agreeable to the complainant and to the insurer.

(b) Whenever a written complaint is accompanied by written request for a public hearing, the commissioner shall review and investigate the matter complained of as provided in Section 1858 and shall grant or deny the request for a public hearing within a reasonable time, but in no event more than 90 days when the complaint is regarding a policy in a personal line of insurance or 120 days in the case of a policy in a class of commercial insurance, unless the complainant consents to a greater time or unless the complainant enters into informal conciliation of the complaint. The time and location of the conciliation shall be mutually agreeable to the complainant and to the insurer.

(c) In the event the complainant enters into informal conciliation of the complaint, the time set forth in subdivisions (a) and (b) for making a determination or for granting or denying a request for a public hearing shall be tolled for up to 10 working days until informal conciliation results in resolution of the complaint or informal conciliation is ended without resolution of the complaint. Should informal conciliation fail to result in resolution of the complaint, the commissioner shall review the facts presented by the complainant and the insurer or rating organization, together with the facts alleged in the complaint and any response to the complaint, to determine whether probable cause exists to believe that a violation of this chapter has occurred.

(d) For purposes of this subdivision, “personal insurance” means all coverages combined in private passenger automobile insurance policies as those policies are described in Section 660 and all forms combined in property or multiperil insurance policies as those policies are described in Section 675.

(e) For purposes of this subdivision, “commercial insurance” means any class, as defined by the Insurance Services Office of commercial insurance and any class of insurance designated under subdivisions (b) and (c) of Section 1857.9.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1289, Sec. 1.5.)
-------------------------------------------

1858.02.

(a) The commissioner may seek resolution of a complaint by informal conciliation at any time and may require the complainant and insurer or rating organization to meet and confer for the purposes of resolving the matter complained of by informal conciliation. The commissioner may decline to find probable cause for a complaint and may deny a request for a public hearing if the complainant refuses to enter into informal conciliation at the commissioner’s request. Likewise, the commissioner may find probable cause for a complaint and may act to hold a public hearing, whether or not a request for a public hearing accompanied the complaint, if the insurer or rating organization refuses to enter into informal conciliation at the commissioner’s request.

(b) Communications to the commissioner in respect to resolution of a complaint by informal conciliation shall be made to him or her in official confidence within the meaning of Sections 1040 and 1041 of the Evidence Code and shall not be disclosed by the commissioner. However, the commissioner may report on the results of informal conciliation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1289, Sec. 1.6.)
-------------------------------------------

1858.05.

Whenever a written complaint and request for hearing with the commissioner has been filed pursuant to Section 1858, and the complaint concerns medical malpractice insurance, the commissioner shall within 30 days either by order deny the hearing or proceed as provided in Sections 1858.1 or 1858.2. The complainant may petition the court for an order to compel compliance with this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, 2nd Ex. Sess., Ch. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

1858.07.

(a) Any person who uses any rate, rating plan, or rating system in violation of this chapter is liable to the state for a civil penalty not to exceed five thousand dollars ($5,000) for each act, or, if the act or practice was willful, a civil penalty not to exceed ten thousand dollars ($10,000) for each act. The commissioner shall have the discretion to establish what constitutes an act. However, when the issuance, amendment, or servicing of a policy or endorsement is inadvertent, all of those acts shall be a single act for the purpose of this section.
